Alaska, session 34, SB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 02.15.155 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 02.15.155. Project costs defined. In AS 02.15.120 - 02.15.155, "project 05 costs" includes, in addition to costs directly related to the project, the sum total of all 06 costs of financing and carrying out the project, including [, BUT NOT LIMITED TO,] 07 the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, 08 engineering, land surveying, landscape architectural, registered interior design, or 09 other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, 10 purchase, construction, reconstruction and improvement of real property, and the 11 acquisition of machinery and equipment as may be necessary in connection with the 12 project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the 13 grantee; the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance 14 the project; and the cost of other items, including any indemnity and surety bonds and 15 premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, 16 financial advisors, and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers 17 necessary. 18 * Sec. 2. AS 08.03.010(c)(3) is amended to read: 19 (3) State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land 20 Surveyors (AS 08.48.011) - June 30, 2033 [2025]; 21 * Sec. 3. AS 08.48.011(b) is amended to read: 22 (b) The board consists of 13 [11] members appointed by the governor having 23 the qualifications as set out in AS 08.48.031. The board consists of 24 (1) two civil engineers; 25 (2) [,] two land surveyors; 26 (3) [,] one mining, petroleum, or chemical engineer; 27 (4) [,] one electrical engineer; 28 (5) one [OR] mechanical engineer; 29 (6) [,] one engineer from another branch of the profession of 30 engineering; 01 (7) [,] two architects; 02 (8) one interior designer; 03 (9) [,] one landscape architect; [,] and 04 (10) one public member. 05 * Sec. 4. AS 08.48.011(b), as amended by sec. 3 of this Act, is amended to read: 06 (b) The board consists of 13 members appointed by the governor having the 07 qualifications as set out in AS 08.48.031. The board consists of 08 (1) two civil engineers; 09 (2) two land surveyors; 10 (3) one mining, petroleum, or chemical engineer; 11 (4) one electrical engineer; 12 (5) one mechanical engineer; 13 (6) one engineer from another branch of the profession of engineering; 14 (7) two architects; 15 (8) one registered interior designer; 16 (9) one landscape architect; and 17 (10) one public member. 18 * Sec. 5. AS 08.48.055(b) is amended to read: 19 (b) The executive administrator of the board shall perform duties as prescribed 20 by the board, including the review and approval of comity applications. The executive 21 administrator is entitled to receive a monthly salary equal to a step in Range 23 22 on the salary schedule set out in AS 39.27.011(a). 23 * Sec. 6. AS 08.48.071(f) is amended to read: 24 (f) The department shall assemble statistics relating to the performance of its 25 staff and the performance of the board, including 26 (1) the number of architects, engineers, land surveyors, [AND] 27 landscape architects, and registered interior designers registered over a five-year 28 period; 29 (2) the rate of passage of examinations required by the board; 30 (3) the number of applicants for registration over a five-year period; 31 (4) an account of registration fees collected under AS 08.01.065; 01 (5) a measure of the correspondence workload of staff. 02 * Sec. 7. AS 08.48.101 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 03 (c) The board shall adopt regulations establishing 04 (1) a definition of "interior design" for the purposes of this chapter; a 05 person may practice interior design without registration as a registered interior 06 designer while not using the title "registered interior designer"; and 07 (2) the type of documents that a registered interior designer is 08 authorized to sign and stamp with an official seal under AS 08.48.221 for the purpose 09 of obtaining requisite permits for construction projects. 10 * Sec. 8. AS 08.48.111 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 08.48.111. Power to revoke, suspend, or reissue certificate. The board 12 may suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke the certificate of or reprimand a registrant, 13 corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited 14 partnership who is found guilty of [(1)] fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate; [(2)] 15 gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct in the practice of architecture, 16 engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or registered interior 17 design; or [(3)] a violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or 18 the code of ethics or professional conduct as adopted by the board. [THE CODE OF 19 ETHICS OR PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED IN 20 WRITING TO EVERY REGISTRANT AND APPLICANT FOR REGISTRATION 21 UNDER THIS CHAPTER. THIS PUBLICATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF THE 22 CODE OF ETHICS OR PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT CONSTITUTES DUE 23 NOTICE TO ALL REGISTRANTS.] The board may revise and amend its code and, 24 upon doing so, shall immediately notify each registrant in writing of the revisions or 25 amendments. The board may, upon petition of the registrant, corporation, limited 26 liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership, reissue a 27 certificate if a majority of the members of the board vote in favor of the reissuance. 28 * Sec. 9. AS 08.48.171 is amended to read: 29 Sec. 08.48.171. General requirements and qualifications for registration. 30 An applicant for registration as an architect, engineer, land surveyor, [OR] landscape 31 architect, or registered interior designer must be of good character and reputation 01 and shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board of the applicant's education, 02 training, and experience. 03 * Sec. 10. AS 08.48.181 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 08.48.181. Registration upon examination. Except as provided in 05 AS 08.48.191, for registration as a professional architect, professional engineer, 06 professional land surveyor, [OR] professional landscape architect, or registered 07 interior designer, a person shall be examined in this state in accordance with the 08 regulations of procedure and standards adopted by the board under AS 44.62 09 (Administrative Procedure Act). The procedure and standards shall at least meet the 10 requirements adopted by recognized national examining councils for these 11 professions. 12 * Sec. 11. AS 08.48.191 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 13 (e) A person holding a certificate of registration authorizing the person to 14 practice registered interior design in a state, territory, or possession of the United 15 States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country that, in the opinion of the board, 16 meets the requirements of this chapter, based on verified evidence, may, upon 17 application, be registered in accordance with the regulations of the board. 18 * Sec. 12. AS 08.48.201(a) is amended to read: 19 (a) Application for registration as a professional architect, a professional 20 engineer, a professional land surveyor, [OR] a professional landscape architect, or a 21 registered interior designer shall be submitted in the manner prescribed by the 22 board. 23 * Sec. 13. AS 08.48.211(b) is amended to read: 24 (b) The certificate of registration is prima facie evidence that the person 25 named in it is entitled to all rights and privileges of a professional architect, 26 professional engineer, professional land surveyor, [OR] professional landscape 27 architect, or registered interior designer while the certificate remains unrevoked or 28 unexpired. 29 * Sec. 14. AS 08.48.215(a) is amended to read: 30 (a) On retiring from practice and payment of an appropriate one-time fee, an 31 individual who is registered as a professional architect, engineer, land surveyor, 01 or landscape architect and [A REGISTRANT] in good standing with the board may 02 apply for the conversion of a certificate of registration to a retired status registration. 03 The registrant may not practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape 04 architecture in the state. A retired status registration is valid for the life of the 05 registration holder and does not require renewal. 06 * Sec. 15. AS 08.48 is amended by adding a new section to read: 07 Sec. 08.48.218. Untitled practice of interior design. This chapter does not 08 prohibit the practice of interior design by a person who is not registered as a registered 09 interior designer if the person does not use the title "registered interior designer." 10 * Sec. 16. AS 08.48.221(a) is amended to read: 11 (a) Each registrant may obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board, 12 bearing the registrant's name, registration number, and the appropriate legend for 13 architect, engineer, land surveyor, [OR] landscape architect, or registered interior 14 designer. When a registrant issues final drawings, specifications, surveys, plats, 15 plates, reports, or similar documents, the registrant shall stamp the documents with the 16 seal and sign the seal. The board shall adopt regulations governing the use of seals by 17 the registrant. An architect, engineer, land surveyor, [OR] landscape architect, or 18 registered interior designer may not affix or permit a seal and signature to be affixed 19 to an instrument after the expiration of a certificate or for the purpose of aiding or 20 abetting another person to evade or attempt to evade a provision of this chapter. The 21 registrant, by sealing and signing the document, certifies that the document was 22 prepared by or under the registrant's responsible charge and is within the registrant's 23 field of practice or is design work of minor importance. 24 * Sec. 17. AS 08.48.241(a) is amended to read: 25 (a) This chapter does not prevent a corporation, limited liability company, 26 limited liability partnership, or limited partnership from offering architectural, 27 engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior 28 design services; however, the corporation, limited liability company, limited liability 29 partnership, or limited partnership shall file with the board 30 (1) an application for a certificate of authorization on a form to be 31 prescribed by the board and containing information required to enable the board to 01 determine whether the corporation, limited liability company, limited liability 02 partnership, or limited partnership is qualified in accordance with the provisions of 03 this chapter to offer to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] 04 landscape architecture, or registered interior design in this state; 05 (2) a certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors of the 06 corporation, the managing members or manager of the limited liability company, the 07 general partners of a limited liability partnership, or the general partners of a limited 08 partnership designating persons holding certificates of registration under this chapter 09 as responsible for the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] 10 landscape architecture, or registered interior design by the corporation, limited 11 liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership in this state and 12 providing that full authority to make all final architectural, engineering, land 13 surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior design decisions on 14 behalf of the corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or 15 limited partnership with respect to work performed by the corporation, limited liability 16 company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership in this state is granted by 17 the board of directors of the corporation, the managing members or manager of the 18 limited liability company, the general partners of the limited liability partnership, or 19 the general partners of the limited partnership to the persons designated in the 20 resolution; however, the filing of this resolution does not relieve the corporation, 21 limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership of any 22 responsibility or liability imposed on it by law or by contract; 23 (3) a designation in writing setting out the name of one or more 24 persons holding certificates of registration under this chapter who are in responsible 25 charge of each major branch of the architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] 26 landscape architectural, or registered interior design activities in which the 27 corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited 28 partnership specializes in this state; if a change is made in the person in responsible 29 charge of a major branch of the architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] 30 landscape architectural, or registered interior design activities, the change shall be 31 designated in writing and filed with the board within 30 days after the effective date of 01 the change. 02 * Sec. 18. AS 08.48.241(b) is amended to read: 03 (b) Upon filing with the board the application for certificate of authorization, 04 certified copy of resolution, affidavit, and designation of persons specified in this 05 section, the board shall, subject to (c) of this section, issue to the corporation, limited 06 liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership a certificate of 07 authorization to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape 08 architecture, or registered interior design in this state upon a determination by the 09 board that 10 (1) the bylaws of the corporation, the articles of organization or 11 operating agreement of the limited liability company, the partnership agreement of the 12 limited liability partnership, or the partnership agreement of the limited partnership 13 contain provisions that all architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape 14 architectural, or registered interior design decisions pertaining to architectural, 15 engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior 16 design activities in this state will be made by the specified architect, engineer, land 17 surveyor, [OR] landscape architect, or registered interior designer in responsible 18 charge, or other registered architects, engineers, land surveyors, [OR] landscape 19 architects, or registered interior designers under the direction or supervision of the 20 architect, engineer, land surveyor, [OR] landscape architect, or registered interior 21 designer in responsible charge; 22 (2) the application for certificate of authorization states the type of 23 architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or registered 24 interior design practiced or to be practiced by the corporation, limited liability 25 company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership; 26 (3) the applicant corporation, limited liability company, limited 27 liability partnership, or limited partnership has the ability to provide architectural, 28 engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior 29 design services; 30 (4) the application for certificate of authorization states the 31 professional records of the designated person who is in responsible charge of each 01 major branch of architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape 02 architectural, or registered interior design activities in which the corporation, limited 03 liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership specializes; 04 (5) the application for certificate of authorization states the experience, 05 if any, of the corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or 06 limited partnership in furnishing architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] 07 landscape architectural, or registered interior design services during the preceding 08 five-year period; 09 (6) the applicant corporation, limited liability company, limited 10 liability partnership, or limited partnership meets other requirements related to 11 professional competence in the furnishing of architectural, engineering, land 12 surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior design services as 13 may be adopted by the board in furtherance of the objectives and provisions of this 14 chapter. 15 * Sec. 19. AS 08.48.241(d) is amended to read: 16 (d) The certificate of authorization must specify the major branches of 17 architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or registered 18 interior design of which the corporation, limited liability company, limited liability 19 partnership, or limited partnership has designated a person in responsible charge as 20 provided in this section. The certificate of authorization shall be conspicuously 21 displayed in the place of business of the corporation, limited liability company, limited 22 liability partnership, or limited partnership, together with the names of persons 23 designated as being in responsible charge of the professional activities. 24 * Sec. 20. AS 08.48.241(e) is amended to read: 25 (e) If a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or 26 limited partnership that is organized solely by [EITHER] a group of architects, a group 27 of engineers, a group of land surveyors, [OR] a group of landscape architects, or a 28 group of registered interior designers, each holding a certificate of registration 29 under this chapter, applies for a certificate of authorization, the board may, in its 30 discretion, grant a certificate of authorization to the corporation, limited liability 31 company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership based on a review of the 01 professional records of the incorporators of the corporation, organizers of the limited 02 liability company, partners who formed the limited liability partnership, or partners 03 who formed the limited partnership in place of the required qualifications set out in 04 this section. If the ownership of the corporation is altered, the membership of the 05 limited liability company is altered, the partners of the limited liability partnership 06 change, or the general partners of the limited partnership change, the corporation, 07 limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership shall 08 apply for a revised certificate of authorization, based on the professional records of the 09 owners of the corporation, the members of the limited liability company, the partners 10 of the limited liability partnership, or the general partners of the limited partnership, if 11 exclusively architects, engineers, land surveyors, [OR] landscape architects, or 12 registered interior designers, or otherwise under the qualifications required by (b)(1) 13 - (4) of this section. 14 * Sec. 21. AS 08.48.241(f) is amended to read: 15 (f) A corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or 16 limited partnership authorized to offer architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] 17 landscape architectural, or registered interior design services under this chapter, 18 together with its directors, officers, managing members, manager, and partners for 19 their own individual acts, is responsible to the same degree as the designated 20 individual registrant, and shall conduct its business without misconduct or malpractice 21 in the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape 22 architecture, or registered interior design as defined in this chapter. 23 * Sec. 22. AS 08.48.251 is amended to read: 24 Sec. 08.48.251. Certain partnerships. This chapter does not prevent the 25 practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or 26 registered interior design by a partnership if all of the members of the partnership 27 are registrants under this chapter. In this section, "partnership" does not include a 28 limited liability partnership or a limited partnership. 29 * Sec. 23. AS 08.48.281 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 30 (c) A person may not use a title tending to convey the impression that the 31 person is a "registered interior designer" while offering to practice or practicing 01 interior design, as defined in regulation by the board, unless the person has been 02 registered or authorized under this chapter. 03 * Sec. 24. AS 08.48.291 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 08.48.291. Violations and penalties. A person who practices or offers to 05 practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or 06 registered interior design in the state without being registered or authorized to 07 practice in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or a person presenting or 08 attempting to use the certificate or the seal of another, or a person who gives false or 09 forged evidence of any kind to the board or to a member of the board in obtaining or 10 attempting to obtain a certificate, or a person who impersonates a registrant, or a 11 person who uses or attempts to use an expired or revoked or nonexistent certificate, 12 knowing of the certificate's status, or a person who falsely claims to be registered and 13 authorized to practice under this chapter, or a person who violates any of the 14 provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is 15 punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for not more than 16 one year, or by both. 17 * Sec. 25. AS 08.48.295(a) is amended to read: 18 (a) In addition to any other provision of law, if a person practices or offers to 19 practice architecture, engineering, [OR] land surveying, or registered interior design 20 in the state without being registered or authorized to practice in accordance with the 21 provisions of this chapter, the board may enter an order levying a civil penalty. 22 * Sec. 26. AS 08.48.311 is amended to read: 23 Sec. 08.48.311. Rights not transferable. The right to engage in the practice of 24 architecture, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or registered 25 interior design is considered a personal and individual right, based on the 26 qualifications of the individual as evidenced by the individual's certificate of 27 registration, which is not transferable. 28 * Sec. 27. AS 08.48.321 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 29 (b) A person uses a title tending to convey the impression that the person is a 30 "registered interior designer" while offering to practice or practicing interior design if 31 the person by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or other means 01 represents to be a registered interior designer or through the use of some other title 02 implies that the person is a registered interior designer when offering to practice or 03 practicing interior design. 04 * Sec. 28. AS 08.48.331(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) This chapter does not apply to 06 (1) a contractor performing work designed by a professional architect, 07 engineer, or landscape architect or the supervision of the construction of the work as a 08 supervisor or superintendent for a contractor; 09 (2) workers in building trades crafts, earthwork, grounds keeping, or 10 nursery operations, and superintendents, supervisors, or inspectors in the performance 11 of their customary duties; 12 (3) an officer or employee of the United States government practicing 13 architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture as required by the 14 person's official capacity; 15 (4) an employee or a subordinate of a registrant if the work or service 16 is done under the direct supervision of a registrant; 17 (5) associates, consultants, or specialists retained by a registrant, [A] 18 partnership of registered individuals, [A] corporation, [A] limited liability company, 19 [A] limited liability partnership, or [A] limited partnership authorized to practice 20 architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture under this chapter, 21 in the performance of professional services if responsible charge of the work remains 22 with the registrant, the partnership, or a designated representative of the corporation, 23 limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership; 24 (6) a person preparing drawings or specifications for 25 (A) a building for the person's own use and occupancy as a 26 single family residence and related site work for that building; 27 (B) farm or ranch buildings and their grounds unless the public 28 health, safety, or welfare is involved; 29 (C) a building that is intended to be used only as a residence by 30 not more than 31 (i) four families and that is not more than two stories 01 high and the grounds of the building; or 02 (ii) two families and that is not more than three stories 03 high and the grounds of the building, if the building is located in a 04 municipality that has adopted a building or residential code that applies 05 to the building and if the building complies with the building or 06 residential code; 07 (D) a garage, workshop, or similar building that contains less 08 than 2,000 square feet of floor space to be used for a private noncommercial 09 purpose and the grounds of the building; 10 (7) a specialty contractor licensed under AS 08.18 while engaged in 11 the business of construction contracting for work designed by an architect, engineer, 12 or landscape architect that is within the specialty to be performed or supervised by the 13 specialty contractor, or a contractor preparing shop or field drawings for work that the 14 specialty contractor has contracted to perform; 15 (8) a person furnishing drawings, specifications, instruments of 16 service, or other data for alterations or repairs to a building or its grounds that do not 17 change or affect the structural system or the safety of the building, or that do not affect 18 the public health, safety, or welfare; 19 (9) a person who is employed by a postsecondary educational 20 institution to teach engineering, architectural, or landscape architectural courses; in 21 this paragraph, "postsecondary educational institution" has the meaning given in 22 AS 14.48.210; 23 (10) an officer or employee of an individual, firm, partnership, 24 association, utility, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, 25 or limited partnership, who practices engineering, architecture, land surveying, or 26 landscape architecture involved in the operation of the employer's business only [, 27 AND FURTHER] if neither the employee nor the employer offers engineering, 28 architecture, land surveying, or landscape architecture services to the public; 29 exclusions under this paragraph do not apply to buildings or structures whose primary 30 use is public occupancy; 31 (11) a person while involved in revegetation, restoration, reclamation, 01 rehabilitation, or erosion control for disturbed land that the board determines does not 02 affect the public health, safety, or welfare; 03 (12) a person while maintaining or directing the placement of plant 04 material that the board determines does not affect the public health, safety, or welfare; 05 (13) an employee, officer, or agent of a regulatory agency of the state 06 or a municipality when reviewing drawings and specifications for compliance with the 07 building codes of the state or a municipality if the drawings and specifications have 08 been sealed and signed by an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect 09 or the preparation of the drawings and specifications is exempt under this section from 10 the requirements of this chapter; in this paragraph, "building codes" includes codes 11 relating to building, mechanical, plumbing, electrical, fire safety standards, and 12 zoning; 13 (14) a person who is designing fire protection systems and is 14 authorized by the Department of Public Safety to design fire protection systems; 15 (15) a person who is 16 (A) authorized to construct, install, or modify a 17 conventional onsite wastewater system by the Department of 18 Environmental Conservation under AS 46.03.100; and 19 (B) constructing, installing, or modifying a conventional 20 onsite wastewater system that serves a commercial facility and has a 21 design flow of less than 500 gallons of wastewater a day. 22 * Sec. 29. AS 08.48.331(a), as amended by sec. 28 of this Act, is amended to read: 23 (a) This chapter does not apply to 24 (1) a contractor performing work designed by a professional architect, 25 engineer, or landscape architect or the supervision of the construction of the work as a 26 supervisor or superintendent for a contractor; 27 (2) workers in building trades crafts, earthwork, grounds keeping, or 28 nursery operations, and superintendents, supervisors, or inspectors in the performance 29 of their customary duties; 30 (3) an officer or employee of the United States government practicing 31 architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture as required by the 01 person's official capacity; 02 (4) an employee or a subordinate of a registrant if the work or service 03 is done under the direct supervision of a registrant; 04 (5) associates, consultants, or specialists retained by a registrant, 05 partnership of registered individuals, corporation, limited liability company, limited 06 liability partnership, or limited partnership authorized to practice architecture, 07 engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture under this chapter, in the 08 performance of professional services if responsible charge of the work remains with 09 the registrant, the partnership, or a designated representative of the corporation, 10 limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership; 11 (6) a person preparing drawings or specifications for 12 (A) a building for the person's own use and occupancy as a 13 single family residence and related site work for that building; 14 (B) farm or ranch buildings and their grounds unless the public 15 health, safety, or welfare is involved; 16 (C) a building that is intended to be used only as a residence by 17 not more than 18 (i) four families and that is not more than two stories 19 high and the grounds of the building; or 20 (ii) two families and that is not more than three stories 21 high and the grounds of the building, if the building is located in a 22 municipality that has adopted a building or residential code that applies 23 to the building and if the building complies with the building or 24 residential code; 25 (D) a garage, workshop, or similar building that contains less 26 than 2,000 square feet of floor space to be used for a private noncommercial 27 purpose and the grounds of the building; 28 (7) a specialty contractor licensed under AS 08.18 while engaged in 29 the business of construction contracting for work designed by an architect, engineer, 30 or landscape architect that is within the specialty to be performed or supervised by the 31 specialty contractor, or a contractor preparing shop or field drawings for work that the 01 specialty contractor has contracted to perform; 02 (8) a person furnishing drawings, specifications, instruments of 03 service, or other data for alterations or repairs to a building or its grounds that do not 04 change or affect the structural system or the safety of the building, or that do not affect 05 the public health, safety, or welfare; 06 (9) a person who is employed by a postsecondary educational 07 institution to teach engineering, architectural, or landscape architectural courses; in 08 this paragraph, "postsecondary educational institution" has the meaning given in 09 AS 14.48.210; 10 (10) an officer or employee of an individual, firm, partnership, 11 association, utility, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, 12 or limited partnership, who practices engineering, architecture, land surveying, or 13 landscape architecture involved in the operation of the employer's business only if 14 neither the employee nor the employer offers engineering, architecture, land 15 surveying, or landscape architecture services to the public; exclusions under this 16 paragraph do not apply to an officer or employee 17 (A) practicing engineering, architecture, land surveying, or 18 landscape architecture on [TO] buildings or structures whose primary use is 19 public occupancy; or 20 (B) of a utility that owns, operates, manages, or controls a 21 pipeline that furnishes by transmission or distributes natural or 22 manufactured gas to the public for compensation and who is practicing 23 engineering on the facilities of the pipeline that operate at a pressure 24 greater than 100 pounds per square inch gauge in one of the following 25 manners: 26 (i) the installation of a new district pressure 27 regulator station, compressor station, or gate station; 28 (ii) the reconfiguration or physical change of a 29 district pressure regulator station, compressor station, or gate 30 station that alters or modifies the configuration or overpressure 31 protection of equipment; in this sub-subparagraph, 01 "reconfiguration or physical change" does not include a routine 02 operating adjustment or similar replacement; or 03 (iii) the installation, uprating, repair by 04 replacement, or abandonment of the pipeline; 05 (11) a person while involved in revegetation, restoration, reclamation, 06 rehabilitation, or erosion control for disturbed land that the board determines does not 07 affect the public health, safety, or welfare; 08 (12) a person while maintaining or directing the placement of plant 09 material that the board determines does not affect the public health, safety, or welfare; 10 (13) an employee, officer, or agent of a regulatory agency of the state 11 or a municipality when reviewing drawings and specifications for compliance with the 12 building codes of the state or a municipality if the drawings and specifications have 13 been sealed and signed by an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect 14 or the preparation of the drawings and specifications is exempt under this section from 15 the requirements of this chapter; in this paragraph, "building codes" includes codes 16 relating to building, mechanical, plumbing, electrical, fire safety standards, and 17 zoning; 18 (14) a person who is designing fire protection systems and is 19 authorized by the Department of Public Safety to design fire protection systems; 20 (15) a person who is 21 (A) authorized to construct, install, or modify a conventional 22 onsite wastewater system by the Department of Environmental Conservation 23 under AS 46.03.100; and 24 (B) constructing, installing, or modifying a conventional onsite 25 wastewater system that serves a commercial facility and has a design flow of 26 less than 500 gallons of wastewater a day. 27 * Sec. 30. AS 08.48.331 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 28 (c) The Department of Environmental Conservation may adopt regulations 29 limiting the locations in the state in which (a)(15) of this section applies. 30 (d) Notwithstanding (a)(10)(B) of this section, this chapter does not apply to 31 an officer or employee of a utility that owns, operates, manages, or controls a pipeline 01 that furnishes by transmission or distributes natural or manufactured gas to the public 02 for compensation and who is practicing engineering in an emergency on the facilities 03 of the pipeline that operate at a pressure greater than 100 pounds per square inch 04 gauge. The utility shall notify the Regulatory Commission of Alaska when an officer 05 or employee of the utility practices engineering in an emergency under this subsection. 06 * Sec. 31. AS 08.48.341(4) is amended to read: 07 (4) "certificate of authorization" means a certificate issued by the 08 board authorizing a corporation, a limited liability company, a limited liability 09 partnership, or a limited partnership to provide professional services in architecture, 10 engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architecture, or registered interior 11 design through individuals legally registered by the board; 12 * Sec. 32. AS 08.48.341(23) is amended to read: 13 (23) "registrant" means a person registered by the board as a 14 professional architect, professional engineer, professional land surveyor, 15 professional [OR] landscape architect, or registered interior designer; 16 * Sec. 33. AS 08.48.341 is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 17 (27) "registered interior design" means the practice of interior design 18 as a registered interior designer; 19 (28) "registered interior designer" means a person who is 20 (A) registered and qualified by education, training, experience, 21 and examination to engage in the practice of interior design, as defined by the 22 board, while using the title "registered interior designer"; and 23 (B) authorized to sign and stamp documents with an official 24 seal under AS 08.48.221, as determined by the board, for the purpose of 25 obtaining requisite permits for construction projects. 26 * Sec. 34. AS 23.30.017(c)(1) is amended to read: 27 (1) "design professional" means a person registered under AS 08.48 as 28 an architect, engineer, [OR] land surveyor, landscape architect, or registered 29 interior designer; 30 * Sec. 35. AS 29.60.400(c) is amended to read: 31 (c) In this section, "costs of construction" means, in addition to costs directly 01 related to a project, the sum of all costs of financing and carrying out the project, 02 including the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, 03 architectural, engineering, land surveying, landscape architectural, registered 04 interior design, or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation 05 and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of real 06 property, and the acquisition of machinery and equipment necessary to the project; an 07 allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; and the 08 cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project, 09 the cost of indemnity and surety bonds, premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and 10 expenses of trustees, depositaries, and financial advisors, and the costs associated with 11 the issuance of bonds. It does not include the cost of feasibility studies. 12 * Sec. 36. AS 34.35.050 is amended to read: 13 Sec. 34.35.050. Lien for labor or materials furnished. A person has a lien, 14 only to the extent provided under this chapter, to secure the payment of the contract 15 price if the person 16 (1) performs labor on [UPON] real property at the request of the owner 17 or the agent of the owner for the construction, alteration, or repair of a building or 18 improvement; 19 (2) is a trustee of an employee benefit trust for the benefit of 20 individuals performing labor on the building or improvement and has a direct contract 21 with the owner or the agent of the owner for direct payments into the trust; 22 (3) furnishes materials that are delivered to real property under a 23 contract with the owner or the agent of the owner that are incorporated in the 24 construction, alteration, or repair of a building or improvement; 25 (4) furnishes equipment that is delivered to and used on [UPON] real 26 property under a contract with the owner or the agent of the owner for the 27 construction, alteration, or repair of a building or improvement; 28 (5) performs services under a contract with the owner or the agent of 29 the owner in connection with the preparation of plans, surveys, or architectural, [OR] 30 engineering, landscape architectural, or registered interior design plans or 31 drawings for the construction, alteration, or repair of a building or improvement, 01 whether or not actually implemented on that property; or 02 (6) is a general contractor. 03 * Sec. 37. AS 35.15.010(c) is amended to read: 04 (c) In this section, "professional services" means architectural, engineering, 05 [OR] land surveying, landscape architectural, or registered interior design 06 services. 07 * Sec. 38. AS 36.30.270(a) is amended to read: 08 (a) Notwithstanding conflicting provisions of AS 36.30.100 - 36.30.260, a 09 procurement officer shall negotiate a contract for an agency with the most qualified 10 and suitable firm or person of demonstrated competence for architectural, engineering, 11 [OR] land surveying, landscape architectural, or registered interior design 12 services. The procurement officer shall award a contract for those services at fair and 13 reasonable compensation as determined by the procurement officer, after 14 consideration of the estimated value of the services to be rendered, and the scope, 15 complexity, and professional nature of the services. When determining the most 16 qualified and suitable firm or person, the procurement officer shall consider the 17 (1) proximity to the project site of the office of the firm or person 18 unless federal law prohibits this factor from being considered in the awarding of the 19 contract; and 20 (2) employment practices of the firm or person with regard to women 21 and minorities. 22 * Sec. 39. AS 36.30.270(d) is amended to read: 23 (d) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a procurement officer 24 may include price as an added factor in selecting architectural, engineering, [AND] 25 land surveying, landscape architectural, and registered interior design services 26 when, in the judgment of the procurement officer, the services required are repetitious 27 in nature, and the scope, nature, and amount of services required are thoroughly 28 defined by measurable and objective standards to reasonably enable firms or persons 29 making proposals to compete with a clear understanding and interpretation of the 30 services required. In order to include price as a factor in selection, a majority of the 31 persons involved by the procurement officer in evaluation of the proposals must be 01 registered in the state to perform architectural, engineering, [OR] land surveying, 02 landscape architectural, or registered interior design services. 03 * Sec. 40. AS 36.30.305(e) is amended to read: 04 (e) Architectural, engineering, [AND] land survey, landscape architectural, 05 and registered interior design contracts under AS 36.30.270 may not be made under 06 this section. 07 * Sec. 41. AS 36.30.990(19) is amended to read: 08 (19) "preconstruction services" means information, research, advice, 09 and related tasks regarding the impacts of design on the physical construction of a 10 project; "preconstruction services" does not mean architectural, engineering, [OR] 11 land surveying, landscape architectural, and registered interior design services; 12 * Sec. 42. AS 36.90.100 is amended to read: 13 Sec. 36.90.100. Contracts for architectural, engineering, land surveying, 14 [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior design services. The state or a 15 municipality may not award a contract for architectural, engineering, land surveying, 16 [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior design services to 17 (1) an individual who is not registered under AS 08.48 to perform the 18 architectural, engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered 19 interior design services required by the contract; 20 (2) a partnership, except as provided by (3) of this section, that is not 21 qualified under AS 08.48.251 to provide the architectural, engineering, land surveying, 22 [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior design services required by the 23 contract; or 24 (3) a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability 25 partnership that is not authorized under AS 08.48.241 to offer the architectural, 26 engineering, land surveying, [OR] landscape architectural, or registered interior 27 design services required by the contract. 28 * Sec. 43. AS 46.07.040(c) is amended to read: 29 (c) In (a) of this section, "cost of the construction of a facility" includes, in 30 addition to costs directly related to the project, the sum total of all costs of financing 31 and carrying out the project. These include [, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO,] the 01 costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, 02 engineering, land surveying, landscape architectural, or other special services, 03 acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, 04 reconstruction, and improvement of real property, and the acquisition of machinery 05 and equipment as may be necessary in connection with the project; an allocable 06 portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; the cost of 07 financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project; and the 08 cost of other items, including any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on 09 insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, 10 and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers necessary. 11 * Sec. 44. AS 08.48.011(c) and AS 36.30.270(e) are repealed. 12 * Sec. 45. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 TRANSITION: BOARD APPOINTMENT. Notwithstanding AS 08.48.031, an 15 interior designer appointed to the State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and 16 Land Surveyors under AS 08.48.011(b), as amended by sec. 3 of this Act, must be certified by 17 the Council for Interior Design Qualification and have resided in the state for at least two 18 years immediately preceding appointment. On and after the effective date of sec. 4 of this Act, 19 an interior designer appointed to the board under AS 08.48.011(b), as amended by sec. 3 of 20 this Act, may continue to occupy the seat on the board reserved for the registered interior 21 designer until a registered interior designer is appointed to the seat. An interior designer 22 appointed to the board under AS 08.48.011(b), as amended by sec. 3 of this Act, is eligible for 23 reappointment to the board on the effective date of sec. 4 of this Act if the interior designer 24 meets the requirements of AS 08.48.011(b), as amended by sec. 4 of this Act. 25 * Sec. 46. Sections 3 and 45 of this Act take effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 26 * Sec. 47. Section 29 of this Act and AS 08.48.331(d), enacted by sec. 30 of this Act, take 27 effect January 1, 2026. 28 * Sec. 48. Except as provided in secs. 46 and 47 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 29 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.